Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2618
Family child care homes; inspections.

All family child care homes which are registered pursuant
to section 43-2609 shall be inspected within sixty days of registration. All
family child care homes registered under section 43-2609 shall be inspected
at least every two years after the initial inspection. It is the intent of
the Legislature that registered family child care homes be inspected annually
if sufficient funds are made available under the federal Child Care and Development
Block Grant Act of 1990 for such purposes.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB1050, § 1.